Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. ORGANIZATION OF COUNTY GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE B. COMMISSIONERS COURT AND COUNTY OFFICERS

CHAPTER 89. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO COUNTY ADMINISTRATION

Sec. 89.001. SPECIAL COUNSEL IN POPULOUS COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court of a county with a population of more than two million may employ an attorney as special counsel.

(b) The special counsel may be employed to:

(1) represent the county in any suit brought by or against the county;

(2) prepare necessary documents and otherwise assist the court, the county engineer, and other county employees in the acquisition of rights-of-way for the county and for state highways; or

(3) represent the county in condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of rights-of-way for highways and other purposes for which the county has the right of eminent domain.

(c) The county attorney shall select the special counsel. If the county does not have a county attorney, the district attorney or criminal district attorney shall select the special counsel. The selecting officer shall determine the terms and duration of employment of the special counsel, subject to the court's approval.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg.,ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 597, Sec. 85, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Renumbered from Sec. 81.023 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2120), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2120), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 127, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 89.002. STATE ASSOCIATION OF COUNTIES. (a) The commissioners court may spend, in the name of the county, money from the county's general fund for membership fees and dues of a nonprofit state association of counties if:

(1) a majority of the court votes to approve membership in the association;

(2) the association exists for the betterment of county government and the benefit of all county officials;

(3) the association is not affiliated with a labor organization;

(4) neither the association nor an employee of the association directly or indirectly influences or attempts to influence the outcome of any legislation pending before the legislature, except that this subdivision does not prevent a person from providing information for a member of the legislature or appearing before a legislative committee at the request of the committee or the member of the legislature; and

(5) neither the association nor an employee of the association directly or indirectly contributes any money, services, or other valuable thing to a political campaign or endorses a candidate or group of candidates for public office.

(b) If any association or organization supported wholly or partly by payments of tax receipts from political subdivisions engages in an activity described by Subsection (a)(4) or (5), a taxpayer of a political subdivision that pays fees or dues to the association or organization is entitled to appropriate injunctive relief to prevent any further activity described by Subsection (a)(4) or (5) or any further payments of fees or dues.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 81.026 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 89.003. CENTRAL MAILING SYSTEM IN COUNTIES WITH POPULATION OF MORE THAN ONE MILLION. The commissioners court of a county with a population of more than one million may establish a central mailing system to serve:

(1) district and county courts in the county, including the office of the clerk of the court;

(2) offices in the county of the judicial district in which the county is located; and

(3) offices and departments of the county.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 146, Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 1995. Renumbered from Local Government Code Sec. 81.029 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(65), eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Renumbered from Sec. 81.030 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 89.004. PRESENTATION OF CLAIM. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a person may not file suit on a claim against a county or an elected or appointed county official in the official's capacity as an appointed or elected official unless the person has presented the claim to the commissioners court and the commissioners court neglects or refuses to pay all or part of the claim before the 60th day after the date of the presentation of the claim.

(b) If the plaintiff in a suit against a county does not recover more than the commissioners court offered to pay on presentation of the claim, the plaintiff shall pay the costs of the suit.

(c) A person may file a suit for injunctive relief against a county. After the court's ruling on the application for temporary injunctive relief, any portion of the suit that seeks monetary damages shall be abated until the claim is presented to the commissioners court and the commissioners court neglects or refuses to pay all or part of the claim by the 60th day after the date of the presentation of the claim.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 81.041 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1203, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 89.0041. NOTICE OF SUIT AGAINST COUNTY. (a) A person filing suit against a county or against a county official in the official's capacity as a county official shall deliver written notice to:

(1) the county judge; and

(2) the county or district attorney having jurisdiction to defend the county in a civil suit.

(b) The written notice must be delivered by certified or registered mail by the 30th business day after suit is filed and contain:

(1) the style and cause number of the suit;

(2) the court in which the suit was filed;

(3) the date on which the suit was filed; and

(4) the name of the person filing suit.

(c) If a person does not give notice as required by this section, the court in which the suit is pending shall dismiss the suit on a motion for dismissal made by the county or the county official.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1203, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1094 (H.B. 2120), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 89.005. JURORS AND WITNESSES. In a suit brought by or against a county, a resident of the county may be a juror or witness if the resident is otherwise competent.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 81.042 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 89.006. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENT. The commissioners court shall settle and pay a judgment against the county in the same manner and pro rata as other similar claims are settled and paid by the court. Execution may not be issued on a judgment against a county.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Renumbered from Sec. 81.043 by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 13.03(b), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.